bg-BG: Място за монтаж на камера за паркиране: Монтаж със скоба (универсален); Вграден монтаж; Монтаж на предната решетка; Монтаж на рамката на регистрационната табела; Монтаж на регистрационната табела; Монтаж на задната броня; Повърхностен монтаж; Монтаж на третия стоп; Монтаж на дръжката на багажника / задната врата; Друго
ro-RO: Locația de montare a camerei de parcare: Prindere cu suport (universală); Prindere la același nivel (încastrată); Prindere pe grila frontală; Prindere pe suportul plăcuței de înmatriculare; Prindere pe plăcuța de înmatriculare; Prindere pe bara de protecție spate; Prindere pe suprafață; Prindere pe a treia lampă de stop; Prindere pe mânerul portbagajului / hayonului; Altele
th: ติดกล้องจอดรถ: ติดตั้งด้วยขายึด (อเนกประสงค์); ติดตั้งแบบฝัง; ติดตั้งที่กระจังหน้า; ติดตั้งที่กรอบป้ายทะเบียน; ติดตั้งที่ป้ายทะเบียน; ติดตั้งที่กันชนหลัง; ติดตั้งบนพื้นผิว; ติดตั้งที่ไฟเบรกดวงที่สาม; ติดตั้งที่มือจับฝากระโปรงท้าย / มือจับกระบะท้าย; อื่นๆ
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης κάμερας στάθμευσης: Τοποθέτηση με στήριγμα (γενικής χρήσης); Χωνευτή τοποθέτηση; Τοποθέτηση σε μπροστινή μάσκα; Τοποθέτηση σε πλαίσιο πινακίδας; Τοποθέτηση σε πινακίδα; Τοποθέτηση σε πίσω προφυλακτήρα; Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση; Τοποθέτηση σε τρίτο φως φρένων; Τοποθέτηση σε λαβή πορτ-μπαγκάζ / πόρτας χώρου αποσκευών; Άλλο
hu: Parkolókamera rögzítési helye: Konzolos rögzítés (univerzális); Süllyesztett rögzítés; Hűtőrácsra rögzíthető; Rendszámtábla keretre rögzíthető; Rendszámtáblára rögzíthető; Hátsó lökhárítóra rögzíthető; Felületre rögzíthető; Harmadik féklámpára rögzíthető; Csomagtartó fogantyúra / csomagtérajtó fogantyúra rögzíthető; Egyéb
sv: Monteringsplats för backkamera: Fästesmontering (universell); Infälld montering; Montering i kylargrill; Montering på registreringsskyltens ram; Montering på registreringsskylt; Montering på bakre stötfångare; Utanpåliggande montering; Montering vid tredje bromsljus; Montering vid bagageluckans/bakluckans handtag; Övrigt
sl-SI: Mesto montaže parkirne kamere: Pritrditev z nosilcem (univerzalna); Poravnana pritrditev; Pritrditev na sprednjo rešetko; Pritrditev na okvir registrske tablice; Pritrditev na registrsko tablico; Pritrditev na zadnji odbijač; Površinska pritrditev; Pritrditev na tretjo zavorno luč; Pritrditev na ročaj prtljažnika / zadnjih vrat; Drugo
lt-LT: Automobilių statymo kameros montavimo vieta: Tvirtinamas laikikliu (universalus); Įleidžiamas; Tvirtinamas prie priekinių grotelių; Tvirtinamas prie valstybinio numerio rėmelio; Tvirtinamas prie valstybinio numerio; Tvirtinamas prie galinio buferio; Paviršinis montavimas; Tvirtinamas prie trečiojo stabdžių žibinto; Tvirtinamas prie bagažinės rankenos; Kita
fr: Emplacement de montage de la caméra de stationnement: Montage sur support (universel); Montage encastré; Montage sur calandre avant; Montage sur cadre de plaque d’immatriculation; Montage sur plaque d’immatriculation; Montage sur pare-chocs arrière; Montage en surface; Montage sur troisième feu stop; Montage sur poignée de coffre/hayon; Autre
ko: 주차 카메라 장착 위치: 브래킷 마운트(범용); 플러시 마운트; 전면 그릴 마운트; 번호판 프레임 마운트; 번호판 마운트; 후면 범퍼 마운트; 표면 마운트; 보조 제동등 마운트; 트렁크 핸들/테일게이트 핸들 마운트; 기타
da: Monteringsplacering for parkeringskamera: Beslagmontering (universel); Planmontering; Montering i kølergitter; Montering på nummerpladeramme; Nummerplademontering; Bagkofangermontering; Overflademontering; Montering på tredje bremselys; Montering på bagagerumshåndtag/bagklaphåndtag; Anden
en: Parking camera mounting location: Bracket mount (universal); Flush mount; Front grille mount; License plate frame mount; License plate mount; Rear bumper mount; Surface mount; Third brake light mount; Trunk handle / tailgate handle mount; Other
nb: Monteringssted for parkeringskamera: Brakettfeste (universelt); Innfelt feste; Feste i frontgrill; Feste på nummerskiltramme; Feste på nummerskilt; Feste på bakfanger; Utenpåliggende feste; Feste på tredje bremselys; Feste på bagasjeromshåndtak / baklukehåndtak; Annet
pl: Miejsce montażu kamery parkowania: Montaż na wsporniku (uniwersalny); Montaż wpuszczany; Montaż na przedniej kratce; Montaż na ramce tablicy rejestracyjnej; Montaż na tablicy rejestracyjnej; Montaż na tylnym zderzaku; Montaż powierzchniowy; Montaż na trzecim świetle stopu; Montaż na uchwycie bagażnika/klapy tylnej; Inne
cs: Umístění parkovací kamery: Montáž na držák (univerzální); Zapuštěná montáž; Montáž do přední mřížky; Montáž na rámeček SPZ; Montáž k SPZ; Montáž do zadního nárazníku; Povrchová montáž; Montáž do třetího brzdového světla; Montáž na madlo kufru/dveří; Jiné
ru: Место установки парковочной камеры: На кронштейне (универсальное); Врезное крепление; В решетку радиатора; В рамку номерного знака; На номерной знак; В задний бампер; Накладное крепление; В третий стоп-сигнал; В ручку багажника/задней двери; Другое
ja: 駐車カメラマウント位置: ブラケットマウント (汎用); フラッシュマウント; フロントグリルマウント; ナンバープレートフレームマウント; ナンバープレートマウント; リアバンパーマウント; サーフェスマウント; サードブレーキライトマウント; トランクハンドル/テールゲートハンドルマウント; その他
tr: Park kamerası montaj konumu: Braket montajı (evrensel); Gömme montaj; Ön ızgara montajı; Plaka çerçevesi montajı; Plaka montajı; Arka tampon montajı; Yüzey montajı; Üçüncü fren lambası montajı; Bagaj kolu / bagaj kapağı kolu montajı; Diğer
sk-SK: Miesto montáže parkovacej kamery: Upevnenie pomocou držiaka (univerzálne); Zapustená montáž; Upevnenie na prednú mriežku; Upevnenie na rám evidenčného čísla; Upevnenie na evidenčné číslo; Upevnenie na zadný nárazník; Povrchová montáž; Upevnenie na tretie brzdové svetlo; Upevnenie na kľučku kufra / kľučku piatych dverí; Iné
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt camera lùi: Giá treo (đa năng); Gắn chìm; Gắn trên lưới tản nhiệt trước; Gắn trên khung biển số; Gắn trên biển số; Gắn trên cản sau; Gắn nổi; Gắn trên đèn phanh thứ ba; Gắn trên tay nắm cốp / cửa sau; Khác
nl: Montagelocatie parkeercamera: Beugelbevestiging (universeel); Inbouw; Grillebevestiging voor; Kentekenplaathouderbevestiging; Kentekenplaatbevestiging; Achterbumperbevestiging; Opbouw; Derde remlichtbevestiging; Bevestiging aan kofferbakgreep / achterklepgreep; Overig
pt-PT: Local de montagem da câmara de estacionamento: Montagem com suporte (universal); Montagem embutida; Montagem na grelha frontal; Montagem na moldura da matrícula; Montagem na matrícula; Montagem no para-choques traseiro; Montagem em superfície; Montagem na terceira luz de travão; Montagem no puxador da bagageira / puxador da porta traseira; Outro
it: Posizione di montaggio della telecamera di parcheggio: Montaggio a staffa (universale); A filo; Montaggio sulla griglia anteriore; Montaggio sul portatarga; Montaggio sulla targa; Montaggio sul paraurti posteriore; Montaggio in superficie; Montaggio sul terzo stop; Montaggio su maniglia del bagagliaio/portellone; Altro
pt-BR: Câmera de estacionamento, local de instalação: Montagem em suporte (universal); Montagem embutida; Montagem na grade frontal; Montagem na moldura da placa de licença; Montagem na placa de licença; Montagem no para-choque traseiro; Montagem em superfície; Montagem na terceira luz de freio; Montagem na maçaneta do porta-malas/tampa traseira; Outro
de: Montageort der Einparkhilfe: Halterungsbefestigung (universell); Bündige Montage; Kühlergrill-Befestigung; Kennzeichenrahmen-Befestigung; Kennzeichen-Befestigung; Heckstoßstangen-Befestigung; Oberflächenmontage; Befestigung am dritten Bremslicht; Kofferraumgriff- / Heckklappengriff-Befestigung; Sonstige
es: Ubicación de montaje de la cámara de estacionamiento: Montaje de soporte (universal); Montaje empotrado; Montaje en la rejilla delantera; Montaje en el marco de la matrícula; Montaje en la matrícula; Montaje en el parachoques trasero; Montaje en superficie; Montaje en la tercera luz de freno; Montaje en la manija del maletero / manija del portón trasero; Otro
fi: Pysäköintikameran asennuspaikka: Kiinnikeasennus (yleismalli); Uppoasennus; Etusäleikköasennus; Rekisterikilven kehyksen kiinnike; Rekisterikilven kiinnike; Takapuskurin kiinnike; Pinta-asennus; Kolmannen jarruvalon kiinnike; Tavaratilan kahvan / takaluukun kahvan kiinnike; Muu
zh-CN: 停车摄像头安装位置: 支架安装（通用）; 嵌入式安装; 前格栅安装; 牌照框安装; 牌照安装; 后保险杠安装; 表面安装; 高位刹车灯安装; 后备箱把手 / 尾门把手安装; 其他
zh-TW: 停車攝影機安裝位置: 支架安裝 (通用); 齊平安裝; 前格柵安裝; 車牌框安裝; 車牌安裝; 後保險桿安裝; 表面安裝; 第三煞車燈安裝; 後車廂把手/尾門把手安裝; 其他
hr-HR: Mjesto montaže parkirne kamere: Montaža na nosač (univerzalna); Ugradbena montaža; Montaža na prednju masku; Montaža na okvir registarske pločice; Montaža na registarsku pločicu; Montaža na stražnji branik; Nadgradna montaža; Montaža na treće stop svjetlo; Montaža na ručku prtljažnika / vrata prtljažnika; Ostalo